de: Zuckerrohrsorte: Schwarz; Black Cheribon; Chewing Cane; Grün; POJ-2878; Lila; Purple Ribbon; Rot; Gelb-Grün; Sonstige
zh-TW: 甘蔗品種: 黑色; 黑切里本; 鮮食甘蔗; 綠色; POJ-2878; 紫色; 紫絲帶; 紅色; 黃綠色; 其他
es: Variedad de la caña de azúcar: Negro; Cheribon negro; Caña de mascar; Verde; POJ-2878; Morado; Purple Ribbon; Rojo; Amarillo verdoso; Otro
hu: Cukornádfajta: Fekete; Black Cheribon; Rágónád; Zöld; POJ-2878; Lila; Purple Ribbon; Piros; Sárgászöld; Egyéb
pl: Odmiana trzciny cukrowej: Czarna; Black Cheribon; Trzcina do żucia; Zielona; POJ-2878; Fioletowa; Purple Ribbon; Czerwona; Żółto-zielona; Inna
lt-LT: Cukranendrių veislė: Juodosios; „Black Cheribon“; Kramtomosios; Žaliosios; POJ-2878; Violetinės; „Purple Ribbon“; Raudonosios; Geltonai žalios; Kita
hr-HR: Sorta šećerne trske: Crna; Crni Cheribon; Trska za žvakanje; Zelena; POJ-2878; Ljubičasta; Ljubičasta vrpca; Crvena; Žuto-zelena; Ostalo
sl-SI: Sorta sladkornega trsa: Črna; Black Cheribon; Žvečilni trs; Zelena; POJ-2878; Vijolična; Purple Ribbon; Rdeča; Rumeno-zelena; Drugo
el: Ποικιλία ζαχαροκάλαμου: Μαύρο; Black Cheribon; Για μάσημα; Πράσινο; POJ-2878; Μωβ; Purple Ribbon; Κόκκινο; Κιτρινοπράσινο; Άλλο
ru: Сорт сахарного тростника: Черный; Черный черибон; Жевательный тростник; Зеленый; POJ-2878; Фиолетовый; Фиолетовая лента; Красный; Желто-зеленый; Другой
sv: Sockerrörssort: Svart; Black Cheribon; Tuggrör; Grön; POJ-2878; Lila; Purple Ribbon; Röd; Gulgrön; Övrigt
it: Varietà di canna da zucchero: Nero; Black Cheribon; Canna da masticare; Verde; POJ-2878; Viola; Purple Ribbon; Rosso; Giallo-verde; Altro
ko: 사탕수수 품종: 검정색; 블랙 체리본; 추잉 케인; 녹색; POJ-2878; 보라색; 퍼플 리본; 빨간색; 황록색; 기타
tr: Şeker kamışı çeşidi: Siyah; Siyah Cheribon; Çiğneme kamışı; Yeşil; POJ-2878; Mor; Mor Kurdele; Kırmızı; Sarı-yeşil; Diğer
vi: Giống mía: Màu đen; Black Cheribon; Mía ăn; Màu xanh lá cây; POJ-2878; Màu tím; Purple Ribbon; Màu đỏ; Xanh lục pha vàng; Khác
da: Sukkerrørsvariant: Sort; Sort cheribon; Tyggerør; Grøn; POJ-2878; Lilla; Purple Ribbon; Rød; Gul-grøn; Andet
cs: Odrůda cukrové třtiny: Černá; Černý Cheribon; Žvýkací třtina; Zelená; POJ-2878; Purpurová; Purpurová stužka; Červená; Žlutozelená; Jiné
pt-BR: Cana-de-açúcar variedade: Preto; Black Cheribon; Cana de mastigar; Verde; POJ-2878; Roxo; Purple Ribbon; Vermelho; Verde-amarelado; Outros
fi: Sokeriruokolajike: Musta; Black Cheribon; Chewing Cane; Vihreä; POJ-2878; Violetti; Purple Ribbon; Punainen; Keltavihreä; Muu
bg-BG: Сорт захарна тръстика: Черен; Черен черибон; Тръстика за дъвчене; Зелен; POJ-2878; Лилав; Лилава лента; Червен; Жълто-зелен; Друго
ro-RO: Soi de trestie de zahăr: Negru; Black Cheribon; Trestie de mestecat; Verde; POJ-2878; Mov; Purple Ribbon; Roșu; Galben-verde; Altele
nl: Suikerriet variëteit: Zwart; Zwarte cheribon; Kauwriet; Groen; POJ-2878; Paars; Purple Ribbon; Rood; Geelgroen; Overig
th: พันธุ์อ้อย: สีดำ; Black Cheribon; อ้อยควั่น; สีเขียว; POJ-2878; สีม่วง; Purple Ribbon; สีแดง; สีเขียวอมเหลือง; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 甘蔗品种: 黑色; 黑切里邦甘蔗; 果蔗; 绿色; POJ-2878; 紫色; 紫丝带; 红色; 黄绿色; 其他
sk-SK: Odroda cukrovej trstiny: Čierna; Black Cheribon; Žuvacia trstina; Zelená; POJ-2878; Fialová; Purple Ribbon; Červená; Žltozelená; Iné
ja: サトウキビの種類: 黒; ブラックチェリボン; チューイングケーン; 緑; POJ-2878; 紫; パープルリボン; 赤; 黄緑; その他
fr: Variété de canne à sucre: Noire; Cheribon noire; Canne à mâcher; Verte; POJ-2878; Violette; Purple Ribbon; Rouge; Jaune-vert; Autre
en: Sugar cane variety: Black; Black Cheribon; Chewing Cane; Green; POJ-2878; Purple; Purple Ribbon; Red; Yellow-Green; Other
nb: Sukkerrørvariant: Svart; Black Cheribon; Chewing cane; Grønn; POJ-2878; Lilla; Purple Ribbon; Rød; Gulgrønn; Annet
pt-PT: Variedade de cana-de-açúcar: Preto; Black Cheribon; Cana de mastigar; Verde; POJ-2878; Roxo; Fita roxa; Vermelho; Amarelo-esverdeado; Outro